en: Canopy & Gazebo Frames
xx: Canopy & Gazebo Frames
cs: Rámy přístřešků a altánů
da: Baldakiner og lysthuse – rammer
de: Rahmen für Pavillons
es: Estructuras para pabellones y cenadores
fr: Cadres pour auvents et abris
it: Strutture per baldacchini e gazebo
ja: キャノピー・ガゼボ用フレーム
nl: Frames voor luifels en prieeltjes
no: Rammer til soltak og paviljonger
pl: Ramy do altan i tarasów
pt: Molduras para dosséis e gazebos
ru: Каркасы для навесов и беседок
sv: Stommar till tält och lusthus
tr: Çardak ve Kamelya Çatıları

en: Canopy & Gazebo Tops
xx: Canopy & Gazebo Tops
cs: Střechy přístřešků a altánů
da: Baldakiner og lysthuse – toppe
de: Dächer für Pavillions
es: Cubiertas para pabellones y cenadores
fr: Bâches de auvents et abris
it: Tetti per baldacchini e gazebo
ja: キャノピー・ガゼボ用トップ
nl: Doeken voor luifels en prieeltjes
no: Topper til soltak og paviljonger
pl: Dachy do altan i tarasów
pt: Coberturas para dosséis e gazebos
ru: Крыши для навесов и беседок
sv: Tak till tält och lusthus
tr: Çardak ve Kamelya Örtüleri

en: Canopy Poles
xx: Canopy Poles
cs: Tyče k přístřeškům a stanům
da: Stolper til udhæng
de: Stangen für Sonnendächer
es: Postes para cenadores
fr: Piquets pour auvents
it: Pali per baldacchini
ja: キャノピー用ポール
nl: Luifelpalen
no: Stolper til soltak
pl: Maszty do altan
pt: Postes para dosséis
ru: Стойки для навесов
sv: Baldakinstolpar
tr: Gölgelik Direkleri

en: Canopy Weights
xx: Canopy Weights
cs: Závaží k přístřeškům a stanům
da: Modvægte til udhæng
de: Gewichte für Sonnendächer
es: Pesos para cenadores
fr: Poids de lestage pour auvents
it: Contrappesi per baldacchini
ja: キャノピー用ウエイト
nl: Luifelgewichten
no: Vekter til soltak
pl: Obciążniki do altan
pt: Pesos para dósseis
ru: Грузы для навесов
sv: Baldakinvikter
tr: Gölgelik Ağırlıkları

en: Garden Arches\, Trellises\, Arbors & Pergolas
xx: Garden Arches\, Trellises\, Arbors & Pergolas
cs: Zahradní oblouky\, paravany\, sedačky a pergoly
da: Havebuer\, espalierer og løvgange
de: Bögen\, Gitter\, Laubengänge & Pergolen
es: Pérgolas\, arcos y enrejados de jardín
fr: Arches\, treillages\, tonnelles et pergolas de jardin
it: Archi\, tralicci\, pergole e pergolati da giardino
ja: 庭用アーチ・棚
nl: Tuinbogen\, traliewerk\, prieeltjes en pergola's
no: Hagebuer\, espalierer og pergolaer
pl: Pergole\, kratki\, altanki
pt: Arcos\, treliças\, caramanchões e pérgolas de jardim
ru: Садовые арки\, шпалеры\, решётки и перголы
sv: Valvbågar\, spaljéer\, bersåer och pergolor
tr: Bahçe Köprü Gözü

en: Garden Bridges
xx: Garden Bridges
cs: Zahradní mostky
da: Havebroer
de: Gartenbrücken
es: Puentes de jardín
fr: Ponts de jardin
it: Ponti da giardino
ja: 庭用橋
nl: Tuinbruggen
no: Hagebroer
pl: Mostki ogrodowe
pt: Pontes para jardins
ru: Садовые мостики
sv: Trädgårdsbroar
tr: Bahçe Köprüsü

en: Sheds\, Garages & Carports
xx: Sheds\, Garages & Carports
cs: Boudy\, garáže a přístřešky pro auta
da: Skure\, garager og carporte
de: Schuppen\, Garagen & Carports
es: Cobertizos\, garajes y almacenes
fr: Cabanes\, garages et auvents pour voitures
it: Rimesse\, tettoie e capanni
ja: 小屋・物置
nl: Schuren\, garages en carports
no: Skur\, garasjer og overbygg
pl: Składziki\, garaże i wiaty
pt: Galpões\, garagens e depósitos
ru: Сараи\, гаражи и навесы для автомобилей
sv: Skjul\, garage och carports
tr: Kulübeler\, Garajlar ve Sundurmalar

en: Outdoor Umbrella & Sunshade Accessories
xx: Outdoor Umbrella & Sunshade Accessories
cs: Venkovní slunečníky – příslušenství
da: Parasoller og solskærme – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Sonnenschirme
es: Accesorios para sombrillas
fr: Accessoires pour parasols et voiles d'ombrage
it: Accessori per ombrelloni e parasole da esterno
ja: パラソル・日よけ関連小物
nl: Accessoires voor parasols en zonweringen
no: Tilbehør til parasoller og solskjermer
pl: Akcesoria do parasoli i pawilonów ogrodowych
pt: Acessórios para guarda-chuva e guarda-sol
ru: Принадлежности для садовых зонтов и тентов
sv: Tillbehör till parasoll och solskydd
tr: Açık Hava Şemsiyeleri ve Deniz Şemsiyeleri Aksesuarları

en: Outdoor Umbrella & Sunshade Fabric
xx: Outdoor Umbrella & Sunshade Fabric
cs: Tkaniny pro venkovní slunečníky
da: Parasoller og solskærme – stof
de: Sonnenschirmstoff
es: Telas para sombrillas y toldos
fr: Tissu pour parasols et voiles d'ombrage
it: Tessuti per ombrelloni e parasoli
ja: パラソル・日よけ用スクリーン
nl: Parasol- en zonweringdoek
no: Stoff til parasoller og solskjermer
pl: Tkaniny do parasoli i pawilonów ogrodowych
pt: Tecido para guarda-chuva e guarda-sol
ru: Ткань для спдовых зонтов и шатров
sv: Tyg till parasoll och solskydd
tr: Açık Hava Şemsiyesi ve Deniz Şemsiyesi Kumaşları

en: Outdoor Umbrella Bases
xx: Outdoor Umbrella Bases
cs: Podstavce pro venkovní slunečníky
da: Parasolfødder
de: Sonnenschirmständer
es: Bases para sombrillas
fr: Supports pour parasols
it: Basi per ombrelli da esterno
ja: パラソルベース
nl: Standaarden voor parasols
no: Parasollføtter
pl: Podstawy parasoli ogrodowych
pt: Suportes para guarda-chuva
ru: Подставки для садовых зонтов
sv: Parasollbaser
tr: Açık Hava Şemsiyesi Ayakları

en: Outdoor Umbrella Covers
xx: Outdoor Umbrella Covers
cs: Obaly na venkovní slunečníky
da: Parasolovertræk
de: Sonnenschirmschutzhüllen
es: Fundas para sombrillas
fr: Housses pour parasols de patio
it: Copri ombrelloni
ja: パラソルカバー
nl: Parasolhoezen
no: Parasolltrekk
pl: Pokrowce na parasole ogrodowe
pt: Capas de guarda-chuva
ru: Чехлы для уличных зонтов
sv: Överdrag till parasoll
tr: Açık Hava Şemsiyesi Örtüleri

en: Outdoor Umbrella Enclosure Kits
xx: Outdoor Umbrella Enclosure Kits
cs: Moskytiéry pro slunečníky
da: Afskærmningssystemer til parasoller
de: Sonnenschirmabdeckungen
es: Kits para cercados de sombrillas exteriores
fr: Moustiquaires pour parasols
it: Kit di protezione per ombrelloni da esterni
ja: 屋外用パラソル スクリーン キット
nl: Sets voor parasoloverkappingen
no: Vind- og solskjerming
pl: Pokrowce do parasoli zewnętrznych
pt: Kits de tela de proteção contra insetos para guarda-sóis
ru: Москитные сетки для зонтов
sv: Parasollskydd
tr: Dış Mekan Şemsiye Örtüsü Malzemeleri

en: Outdoor Umbrella Lights
xx: Outdoor Umbrella Lights
cs: Osvětlení ke slunečníkům
da: Lys til parasoller
de: Sonnenschirmbeleuchtung
es: Luces de sombrilla para exteriores
fr: Lampes pour parasols
it: Luci per ombrelloni per esterno
ja: パラソル用照明
nl: Verlichting voor parasols
no: Lys for parasoller
pl: Oświetlenie do parasoli ogrodowych
pt: Luzes para guarda-sol
ru: Светильники для уличных зонтов
sv: Parasollampor
tr: Dış Mekan Şemsiye Lambaları

en: Outdoor Umbrellas & Sunshades
xx: Outdoor Umbrellas & Sunshades
cs: Venkovní slunečníky a sluneční clony
da: Parasoller og solskærme
de: Sonnenschirme
es: Sombrillas
fr: Parasols et voiles d'ombrage, Parasol, Voile d'ombrage
it: Parasole
ja: パラソル・日よけ
nl: Parasols
no: Parasoller og solskjermer
pl: Parasole i pawilony ogrodowe
pt: Guarda-chuvas e guarda-sóis
ru: Уличные зонты и шатры
sv: Parasoll och solskydd
tr: Açık Hava Şemsiyeleri ve Deniz Şemsiyeleri

en: Porch Swing Accessories
xx: Porch Swing Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k houpačkám
da: Tilbehør til gyngesofaer
de: Zubehör für Hollywoodschaukeln
es: Accesorios de columpios para porche
fr: Accessoires pour balancelles
it: Accessori per altalene da patio
ja: スウィング ベンチ用品
nl: Accessoires voor verandaschommels
no: Tilbehør til verandahusker
pl: Akcesoria do huśtawek ogrodowych
pt: Acessórios para bancos de balanço
ru: Принадлежности для садовых качелей
sv: Tillbehör för hammockar
tr: Veranda Hamak Aksesuarları

en: Porch Swings
xx: Porch Swings
cs: Houpací křesla
da: Gyngesofaer
de: Hollywoodschaukeln
es: Balancines de jardín
fr: Balancelles de jardin, Balancelle de jardin
it: Altalene da patio
ja: スウィングベンチ
nl: Verandaschommels
no: Verandahusker
pl: Huśtawki ogrodowe
pt: Balanços para varandas
ru: Садовые качели
sv: Hammockar
tr: Veranda Salıncakları

en: Outdoor Power Equipment
xx: Outdoor Power Equipment
cs: Motorová zahradní technika
da: Elektriske haveredskaber
de: Gartenmaschinen
es: Maquinaria de jardinería
fr: Équipement électrique d'extérieur
it: Attrezzatura motorizzata per esterni
ja: ガーデン機器
nl: Elektrische apparatuur voor buitengebruik
no: Utendørsmaskiner
pl: Silnikowe narzędzia ogrodowe
pt: Equipamento elétrico de exteriores de residências
ru: Электрооборудование для садовых работ
sv: Utomhusmaskiner
tr: Elektrikli Bahçe Ekipmanları

en: Chainsaws
xx: Chainsaws
cs: Řetězové pily
da: Kædesave
de: Kettensägen
es: Motosierras
fr: Tronçonneuses, Tronçonneuse électrique, Tronçonneuse thermique
it: Motoseghe
ja: チェーンソー
nl: Kettingzagen
no: Motorsager
pl: Piły łańcuchowe
pt: Motosserras
ru: Цепные пилы
sv: Motorsågar
tr: Zincirli Testereler

en: Grass Edgers
xx: Grass Edgers
cs: Obrubovače trávníků
da: Græstrimmere
de: Rasenkantentrimmer
es: Recortadoras de césped
fr: Coupe-gazon
it: Tosaerba
ja: 芝生縁刈り機
nl: Kantenstekers
no: Kantklippere
pl: Krawędziarki do trawników
pt: Cortadores de grama para acabamento
ru: Машины для подрезки кромок газонов
sv: Kanttrimmare
tr: Çim Kenar Düzelticiler

en: Hedge Trimmers
xx: Hedge Trimmers
cs: Nůžky na živé ploty
da: Hækklippere
de: Elektrische Heckenscheren
es: Cortasetos
fr: Taille-haies, Taille-haie électrique, Taille-haie thermique
it: Tagliasiepi
ja: ヘッジトリマー
nl: Heggenschaar
no: Hekkeklippere
pl: Przycinarki do żywopłotu
pt: Aparadores de cercas
ru: Машины для подрезки живой изгороди
sv: Häcksaxar
tr: Çit Budama Makineleri